South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3256.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.A.  Section 59-32-30 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (H)(1) The instruction on human growth and development required in this section must include a presentation of: (a) a high-definition ultrasound video, at least three minutes in duration, showing the development of the brain, heart, sex organs, and other vital organs in early fetal development; and (b) a high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation comparable in quality with the "Meet Baby Olivia" video developed by Live Action, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit, showing the process of fertilization and every stage of human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development for every week of pregnancy until birth. (2) Notwithstanding a provision of law to the contrary, the Attorney General may bring a civil action for a writ of mandamus to compel a public school district to comply with item (1). B. This section is applicable beginning with the 2026-2027 School Year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----